North Dakota statutes. TITLE 25 Mental and Physical Illness or Disability
CHAPTER 25-06 Education of Blind Persons

25-06-01.
North Dakota vision services — school for the blind — Maintained — Location.

There must be maintained at Grand Forks, in Grand Forks County, a statewide service, resource, and referral center for the education and training of all residents of this state who are blind or have a visual impairment and to serve as the national instructional materials access center authorized user for the purpose of facilitating access to and conversion of accessible instructional materials in alternate formats for use by blind individuals, individuals with visual impairment, and students with other print disabilities, which must be known as the North Dakota vision services — school for the blind.

Source:

S.L. 1895, ch. 24, § 1; R.C. 1895, § 967; R.C. 1899, § 967; R.C. 1905, § 1152; C.L. 1913, § 1699; R.C. 1943, § 25-0601; I.M. June, 1958, S.L. 1959, ch. 428, § 1; 2001, ch. 257, § 2; 2009, ch. 240, § 1.

Cross-References.

Cruel treatment of persons admitted to state institutions a misdemeanor, see § 25-01-16.

Location of blind school, see N.D. Const., Art. IX, § 13.

Participation of blind in social and economic activities, see N.D.C.C. ch. 25-13.

Students may fish without license, see § 20.1-03-04.

Law Reviews.

Schools — Nature of the Right to Instruction — The Substantive Requirements of “Free Appropriate Public Education” Under the Education of All Handicapped Children Act of 1975, 59 N.D. L. Rev. 551 (1983).

25-06-01.1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

An individual who is blind means an individual who is totally blind or whose central visual acuity does not exceed twenty/two hundred in the better eye with corrective lenses, or the widest diameter of the visual field is no greater than twenty degrees;

An individual with a visual impairment means an individual with an impairment in vision which, even with correction, adversely affects the individual’s functional ability; and

A student with print disabilities means a student enrolled in elementary or secondary school who has an individualized education program, which includes documentation of either an inability to read or use standard printed material as a result of physical limitations or a reading disability resulting from an organic dysfunction that has been certified by competent authority to be of sufficient severity to prevent reading of printed material in a normal manner.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 257, § 1; 2009, ch. 240, § 2.

25-06-02.
Duties and responsibilities of North Dakota vision services — school for the blind.

Within the limits of legislative appropriation, North Dakota vision services — school for the blind shall:

Provide vision-specific services that include consultations, evaluations, information, training, and educational services, including instruction in orientation, mobility, braille, braille music, daily living skills, technology, career and technical education training, and recreation.

Collect and distribute information on vision services and resources available in the state.

Coordinate loans of adaptive devices, equipment, and materials.

Maintain a database of residents who are blind or have a visual impairment.

Facilitate collaboration with agencies and programs providing services to individuals who are blind or have a visual impairment.

Assist residents to access appropriate services, including services available from the vocational rehabilitation division, independent living centers, infant development programs, developmental disabilities programs, the state library, local education programs, and advocacy programs.

Serve as the national instructional materials access center authorized user for the purpose of facilitating access to and conversion of accessible instructional materials in alternate formats for use by blind individuals, individuals with visual impairment, and students with other print disabilities.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 25-0602; S.L. 1997, ch. 244, § 1; 2001, ch. 257, § 3; 2003, ch. 138, § 72; 2009, ch. 240, § 3.

25-06-02.1.
North Dakota vision services — school for the blind — Appointment of superintendent, budget, staff, and reporting structure.

The superintendent of the North Dakota vision services — school for the blind is appointed by and reports to the superintendent of public instruction. The North Dakota vision services — school for the blind must have a separate budget and separate staff from the department of public instruction.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 239, § 6; 2001, ch. 257, § 6.

25-06-02.2.
Superintendent — Special duties.

The superintendent of the North Dakota vision services — school for the blind may also be the superintendent of the school for the deaf.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 244, § 2; 2001, ch. 257, § 6.

25-06-03.
Superintendent to possess certain qualifications.

The superintendent of the North Dakota vision services — school for the blind must possess those qualifications, educational and otherwise, as in the opinion of the superintendent of public instruction may qualify that person to instruct and minister to the needs of blind persons.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 25-0603; S.L. 1989, ch. 239, § 7; 1989, ch. 339, § 1; 1991, ch. 296, § 1; 2001, ch. 257, § 6.

25-06-03.1.
Criminal history record checks.

The school for the blind may require any employee, final applicant for employment, or any individual otherwise providing services to the school to submit to a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check. The nationwide criminal history record check must be conducted in the manner provided in section 12-60-24. The school for the blind may assess all costs associated with obtaining a criminal history record check to the individual upon whom the criminal history record check is conducted.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 100, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

25-06-04.
Qualifications for admission to school for the blind — Residents of state entitled to free education. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 257, § 5.

25-06-05.
Services to nonresidents.

Individuals who are blind or have a visual impairment who are not residents of this state may receive services from North Dakota vision services — school for the blind if the individuals pay the cost of the services as determined by the superintendent of public instruction. Nonresidents may not receive services to the exclusion of residents of this state.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 25-0605; S.L. 1989, ch. 239, § 9; 2001, ch. 257, § 4.

25-06-06.
Transportation of indigent persons. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 336, § 3.

25-06-07.
Instruction at school for the blind. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 257, § 5.

25-06-08.
Accounts for clothing — How collected. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 244, § 4.

25-06-09.
Blind persons — Duty to report. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 257, § 5.

25-06-10.
Purchase and resale of vision-specific adaptive aids, devices, and appliances — Revolving fund — Continuing appropriation.

A revolving vision aids, devices, and appliances fund is hereby established in the state treasury to be used by the North Dakota vision services — school for the blind to purchase and resell vision-specific adaptive aids, devices, and appliances to be used by blind and visually impaired persons resident in this state. The North Dakota vision services — school for the blind may apply service charges when needed to cover the cost of purchasing, invoicing, and shipping, and all revenue from the sale of aids, appliances, devices, and shipping and postage fees must be deposited in the fund. The North Dakota vision services — school for the blind may receive gifts, grants, and donations for deposit in and use by the fund. All moneys in the revolving fund are hereby appropriated to the North Dakota vision services — school for the blind on a continuing basis for expenditure for the purposes of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 245, § 1; 2001, ch. 257, § 6.

25-06-11.
School for the blind fund.

The school for the blind fund is a special fund in the state treasury. All moneys received pursuant to section 2 of article IX of the Constitution of North Dakota, revenues received from services and leases, and contributions must be deposited in the fund. Moneys in the fund are to be used pursuant to legislative appropriation for the provision of services under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 12, § 24, effective July 1, 2017.